Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2610
Court appointment of guardian of minor; qualification; priority of minor's nominee.

The court may appoint as guardian any person whose appointment would be in the best interests of the minor. The court shall appoint a person nominated by the minor, if the minor is fourteen years of age or older, unless the court finds the appointment contrary to the best interests of the minor.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 228, UPC § 5-206.